Massachusetts, session 194th, H3996.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The ninth paragraph of section 3 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following 2 sentences:-
Any damage to the public health, safety and welfare shall be proven in a court of law by local
authorities that seek to restrict the use of solar systems attached to permanent buildings. No
home owners' association or other owner’s organization shall unreasonably refuse or
unreasonably delay the installation of solar energy systems or the building of structures that
facilitate the collection of solar energy on roofs pursuant to section 25 of chapter 183A.
SECTION 2. Chapter 183A of the General Laws, as amended by section 47 of chapter
150 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 25. No home owners' association or organization of owners shall unreasonably
refuse or unreasonably delay the installation of solar energy systems or the building of structures
that facilitate the collection of solar energy on roofs. A home owners' association or organization
of 2

of owners may impose reasonable restrictions on installation of solar energy systems or the
building of structures that facilitate the collection of solar energy on roofs.
of 2